Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.517, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Applicability. An applicant who applies for licensure as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist by reciprocity must meet the requirements of subdivisions 2 and 3.new text begin An applicant who applies for licensure as an audiologist by reciprocity must pass the practical exam required under section 148.515, subdivision 6.new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.517, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Current credentials required. An applicant applying for licensure by reciprocity must provide evidence to the commissioner that the applicant holds a current and unrestricted credential for the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology in another jurisdiction that has requirements equivalent to or higher than those in effect for determining whether an applicant in this state is qualified to be licensed as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist. An applicant who provides sufficient evidence need not meet the requirements of section 148.515,new text begin except for subdivision 6,new text end provided that the applicant otherwise meets all other requirements of section 148.514. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.5191, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Renewal deadline. Each license, including a temporary license provided under section 148.5161, must state an expiration date. An application for licensure renewal must be received by the Department of Health deleted text begin or postmarkeddeleted text end at least 30 days before the expiration date. deleted text begin If the postmark is illegible, the application shall be considered timely if received at least 21 days before the expiration date.deleted text end When the commissioner establishes the renewal schedule for an applicant, licensee, or temporary licensee, if the period before the expiration date is less than two years, the fee shall be prorated.